hu: Skimboard kialakítása: Szénszál; Kompozit; Üvegszál; Habmag; Famag; Egyéb
ru: Конструкция скимборда: Углеродное волокно; Композитный материал; Стекловолокно; Сердечник из пены; Деревянный сердечник; Другое
lt-LT: Pakrančių banglentės konstrukcija: Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Stiklo pluoštas; Putplasčio šerdis; Medinė šerdis; Kita
el: Κατασκευή skimboard: Ανθρακονήματα; Σύνθετο; Ύαλονημα; Πυρήνας αφρού; Ξύλινος πυρήνας; Άλλο
en: Skimboard construction: Carbon fiber; Composite; Fiberglass; Foam core; Wood core; Other
da: Konstruktion af skimboard: Kulfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Skumkerne; Trækerne; Andet
zh-CN: 浅水冲浪板结构: 碳纤维; 复合材料; 玻璃纤维; 泡沫芯; 木芯; 其他
es: Construcción de la tabla de skimboard: Fibra de carbono; Material compuesto; Fibra de vidrio; Núcleo de espuma; Núcleo de madera; Otro
vi: Kết cấu của ván lướt sóng skimboard: Sợi carbon; Composite; Sợi thủy tinh; Lõi xốp; Lõi gỗ; Khác
cs: Konstrukce skimboardu: Karbonové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Pěnové jádro; Dřevěné jádro; Jiná
pt-PT: Construção da prancha de skimboard: Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Núcleo de espuma; Núcleo de madeira; Outro
nb: Konstruksjon av skimboard: Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Glassfiber; Skumkjerne; Trekjerne; Annet
ja: スキムボード構造: カーボンファイバー; コンポジット; グラスファイバー; フォームコア; ウッドコア; その他
hr-HR: Konstrukcija skimboarda: Ugljična vlakna; Kompozit; Stakloplastika; Pjenasta jezgra; Drvena jezgra; Ostalo
ro-RO: Construcție a skimboard-ului: Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Fibră de sticlă; Miez de spumă; Miez de lemn; Alta
sk-SK: Konštrukcia skimboardu: Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Penové jadro; Drevené jadro; Iné
sv: Konstruktion för skimboard: Kolfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Skumkärna; Träkärna; Övrigt
tr: Skimboard yapısı: Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Cam elyaf; Köpük dolgulu; Ahşap dolgulu; Diğer
sl-SI: Izdelava deske za plitvine: Ogljikova vlakna; Kompozit; Steklena vlakna; Jedro iz pene; Leseno jedro; Drugo
zh-TW: 淺灘衝浪板結構: 碳纖維; 複合材質; 玻璃纖維; 泡棉核心; 木質核心; 其他
ko: 스킴보드 구조: 탄소 섬유; 복합재; 유리 섬유; 폼 코어; 우드 코어; 기타
th: โครงสร้างของสกีมบอร์ด: คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; คอมโพสิต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; แกนโฟม; แกนไม้; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Конструкция на скимборд: Въглеродни влакна; Композитна; Фибростъкло; Ядро от пяна; Дървено ядро; Друга
de: Bauart des Skimboards: Kohlefaser; Komposit; Fiberglas; Schaumkern; Holzkern; Andere
fi: Liirtolaudan rakenne: Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Lasikuitu; Vaahtoydin; Puuydin; Muu
it: Costruzione dello skimboard: Fibra di carbonio; Composito; Vetroresina; Anima in schiuma; Anima in legno; Altro
fr: Fabrication d'un skimboard: Fibre de carbone; Composite; Fibre de verre; Cœur en mousse; Cœur en bois; Autre
pl: Konstrukcja deski skimboardowej: Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Włókno szklane; Rdzeń piankowy; Rdzeń drewniany; Inne
pt-BR: Prancha de skinboarding, construção: Fibra de carbono; Material composto; Fibra de vidro; Núcleo de espuma; Núcleo de madeira; Outra
nl: Skimboardconstructie: Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Glasvezel; Schuimkern; Houten kern; Overig